Colorado statutes. TITLE 36 Natural Resources - General
PART 1
STATE BOARD OF LAND COMMISSIONERS

36-7-101. Tree defined.

For the purposes of this article, the word "tree" means all vegetable growth of a woody texture of any size whatsoever. No lands contemplated in this law shall be leased for any purpose whatsoever that will destroy the tree growth.

Source:

L. 01:

p. 188, § 9.

R.S. 08:

§ 2634.

C.L.

§ 1221.

CSA:

C. 134, § 121.

CRS 53:

§ 112-7-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-7-6.

36-7-102. Trees not to be cut.

No trees needed to conserve the snows, ice, or water of any irrigation district shall be cut from any part of the public domain, except as provided in this article.

Source:

L. 01:

p. 185, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2626.

C.L.

§ 1213.

CSA:

C. 134, § 115.

CRS 53:

§ 112-7-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-7-1.

Cross references:

For irrigation district laws, see articles 41 to 50 of title 37.

36-7-103. Disposition of timber on state lands.

The state board of land commissioners, referred to in this article as the "board", is authorized to sell and otherwise dispose of timber on state lands; to secure the maximum possible amount therefrom, based upon cruised and appraised quantities thereon, location, accessibility, and market conditions; to issue permits of authority for timber cuttings; and to require cash deposits in advance to apply on such timber-cutting permits. In cases in which the appraised value of timber involved in any proposed sale exceeds five thousand dollars, competitive bids shall be received by the board, after call for such bids has been advertised over a thirty-day period in three issues of a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which the timber is located.

The board, when contracting with the Colorado state forest service, shall direct the service to use the appropriate methods necessary to ensure proper management of state trust lands whenever the board contracts for the disposition from state lands of timber that:

Has been infested with bark beetles; or

Is harvested from a forest whose health is otherwise in decline or from which the board anticipates declining revenues due to forest health factors.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 572, § 1.

CSA:

C. 134, § 119(1).

CRS 53:

§ 112-7-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-7-2.

L. 65:

p. 922, § 3.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1078, § 1, effective March 26.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-267), ch. 302, p. 1454, § 3, effective June 8.

Cross references:

In 2011, this section was amended by the "Forest Health Act of 2011". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see section 1 of chapter 302, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

36-7-104. Rules regulating sale.

The board shall issue rules regulating the following: The sale of timber; timber protection of the young growth and the remaining stand in accordance with approved forestry practice; the filing of applications by purchasers; the issuing of permits of authority for cuttings; the cruising and appraisement of timber quantities to be sold; and the expenses to be paid by the timber purchaser.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 573, § 2.

CSA:

C. 134, § 119(2).

CRS 53:

§ 112-7-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-7-3.

36-7-105. Protection from fire.

The board shall endeavor by every means at its disposal to protect the state's timber lands from fire menace and destructive timber fires. It shall cooperate with the United States forest service and otherwise for such protection when timber fires occur and hire all necessary help, laborers, or firefighters for the extinguishing of such fires. It shall construct within the state forest lands and on its exterior boundary lines locked fire booths containing necessary apparatus for fighting fires and post in conspicuous places within the area and outside on the exterior boundary lines of the state's forest lands, fire warnings and supply all modern fire fighting appliances and equipment necessarily required in approved forestry protection practice.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 573, § 3.

CSA:

C. 134, § 119(3).

CRS 53:

§ 112-7-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-7-4.

36-7-106. Bond of person cutting trees.

The state board of land commissioners shall require of all persons cutting trees upon state lands a bond in a sufficient amount, with good and approved security, for the carrying out in good faith of the provisions of part 2 of this article.

Source:

L. 01:

p. 188, § 8.

R.S. 08:

§ 2633.

C.L.

§ 1220.

CSA:

C. 134, § 120.

CRS 53:

§ 112-7-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-7-5.

36-7-107. District attorneys to prosecute.

The district attorneys of the various judicial districts of the state are directed to prosecute in the name of the state all cases arising under this article.

Source:

L. 01:

p. 190, § 17.

R.S. 08:

§ 2642.

C.L.

§ 1229.

CSA:

C. 134, § 129.

CRS 53:

§ 112-7-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-7-8.